Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.100

Order to county board to include weed from state board's list in county's noxious weed list.

Where any of the following occur, the state noxious weed control board must hold a hearing, then may order any county noxious weed control board or weed district to include a noxious weed from the state board's list in the county's noxious weed list:

(1) Where the state noxious weed control board receives a petition from at least one hundred registered voters within the county requesting that the weed be listed.

(2) Where the state noxious weed control board receives a request for inclusion from an adjacent county's noxious weed control board or weed district, which the adjacent board or district has included that weed in its county or district list, and the adjacent board or weed district documents that its noxious weed control program is being hampered by the failure to include the weed on the county's noxious weed list.

[ 2021 c 217 s 7; 1997 c 353 s 12; 1987 c 438 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 10.]